src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/verb-tenses_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst

Tests:
  
  # Primary verbs (end in a consonant)

  # Primary Verbs without stem lengthening don't really exist
  # TODO: what about prefixed verbs like hócir- ???

  Primary Verbs with stem lengthening:
    car-+V+Past+Sing: carne
    car-+V+Past+Plur: carner
    car-+V+Past+Sing+1: [carnen, carnenye]
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [acárie, cárie]
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: cárie
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [acárier, cárier]
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: cárier
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [acárien, acárienye, cárien, cárienye]
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [cárien, cárienye]
    car-+V+Pres+Sing: care
    car-+V+Pres+Plur: carir
    car-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [carin, carinye]
    car-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: cára
    car-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: cárar
    car-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [cáran, cáranye]
    car-+V+Fut+Sing: caruva
    car-+V+Fut+Plur: caruvar
    car-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [caruvan, caruvanye]
  
  Primary Verbs with past tense metathesis:
    # TODO
    # -t: hat-
    hat-+V+Past+Sing: hante
    hat-+V+Past+Plur: hanter
    hat-+V+Past+Sing+1: [hanten, hantenye]
    hat-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [ahátie, hátie]
    hat-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: hátie
    hat-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [ahátier, hátier]
    hat-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: hátier
    hat-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [ahátien, ahátienye, hátien, hátienye]
    hat-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [hátien, hátienye]
    hat-+V+Pres+Sing: hate
    hat-+V+Pres+Plur: hatir
    hat-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [hatin, hatinye]
    hat-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: háta
    hat-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: hátar
    hat-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [hátan, hátanye]
    hat-+V+Fut+Sing: hatuva
    hat-+V+Fut+Plur: hatuvar
    hat-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [hatuvan, hatuvanye]
    # -c: tec-
    tec-+V+Past+Sing: tence
    tec-+V+Past+Plur: tencer
    tec-+V+Past+Sing+1: [tencen, tencenye]
    tec-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [etécie, técie]
    tec-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: técie
    tec-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [etécier, técier]
    tec-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: técier
    tec-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [etécien, etécienye, técien, técienye]
    tec-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [técien, técienye]
    tec-+V+Pres+Sing: tece
    tec-+V+Pres+Plur: tecir
    tec-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [tecin, tecinye]
    tec-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: téca
    tec-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: técar
    tec-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [técan, técanye]
    tec-+V+Fut+Sing: tecuva
    tec-+V+Fut+Plur: tecuvar
    tec-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [tecuvan, tecuvanye]
    # -p: top-
    top-+V+Past+Sing: tompe
    top-+V+Past+Plur: tomper
    top-+V+Past+Sing+1: [tompen, tompenye]
    top-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [otópie, tópie]
    top-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: tópie
    top-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [otópier, tópier]
    top-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: tópier
    top-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [otópien, otópienye, tópien, tópienye]
    top-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [tópien, tópienye]
    top-+V+Pres+Sing: tope
    top-+V+Pres+Plur: topir
    top-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [topin, topinye]
    top-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: tópa
    top-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: tópar
    top-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [tópan, tópanye]
    top-+V+Fut+Sing: topuva
    top-+V+Fut+Plur: topuvar
    top-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [topuvan, topuvanye]
    # -w: cav-/ca{w}-
    cav-+V+Past+Sing: can{w}e
    cav-+V+Past+Plur: can{w}er
    cav-+V+Past+Sing+1: ['can{w}en', 'can{w}enye']
    cav-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: ['acá{w}ie', 'cá{w}ie']
    cav-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: cá{w}ie
    cav-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: ['acá{w}ier', 'cá{w}ier']
    cav-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: cá{w}ier
    cav-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: ['acá{w}ien', 'acá{w}ienye', 'cá{w}ien', 'cá{w}ienye']
    cav-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: ['cá{w}ien', 'cá{w}ienye']
    cav-+V+Pres+Sing: ca{w}e
    cav-+V+Pres+Plur: ca{w}ir
    cav-+V+Pres+Sing+1: ['ca{w}in', 'ca{w}inye']
    cav-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: cá{w}a
    cav-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: cá{w}ar
    cav-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: ['cá{w}an', 'cá{w}anye']
    cav-+V+Fut+Sing: ca{w}uva
    cav-+V+Fut+Plur: ca{w}uvar
    cav-+V+Fut+Sing+1: ['ca{w}uvan', 'ca{w}uvanye']
  
  Primary Verbs with past tense assimilation:
    # TODO
    # -l: col-
    col-+V+Past+Sing: colle
    col-+V+Past+Plur: coller
    col-+V+Past+Sing+1: [collen, collenye]
    col-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [ocólie, cólie]
    col-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: cólie
    col-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [ocólier, cólier]
    col-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: cólier
    col-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [ocólien, ocólienye, cólien, cólienye]
    col-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [cólien, cólienye]
    col-+V+Pres+Sing: cole
    col-+V+Pres+Plur: colir
    col-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [colin, colinye]
    col-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: cóla
    col-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: cólar
    col-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [cólan, cólanye]
    col-+V+Fut+Sing: coluva
    col-+V+Fut+Plur: coluvar
    col-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [coluvan, coluvanye]
    # -s: us-
    us-+V+Past+Sing: usse
    us-+V+Past+Plur: usser
    us-+V+Past+Sing+1: [ussen, ussenye]
    us-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [usúsie, úsie]
    us-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: úsie
    us-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [usúsier, úsier]
    us-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: úsier
    us-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [usúsien, usúsienye, úsien, úsienye]
    us-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [úsien, úsienye]
    us-+V+Pres+Sing: use
    us-+V+Pres+Plur: usir
    us-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [usin, usinye]
    us-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: úsa
    us-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: úsar
    us-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [úsan, úsanye]
    us-+V+Fut+Sing: usuva
    us-+V+Fut+Plur: usuvar
    us-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [usuvan, usuvanye]
    # -þ: ces-
    ces-+V+Past+Sing: ceþþe
    ces-+V+Past+Plur: ceþþer
    ces-+V+Past+Sing+1: [ceþþen, ceþþenye]
    ces-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [ecéþie, céþie]
    ces-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: céþie
    ces-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [ecéþier, céþier]
    ces-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: céþier
    ces-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [ecéþien, ecéþienye, céþien, céþienye]
    ces-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [céþien, céþienye]
    ces-+V+Pres+Sing: ceþe
    ces-+V+Pres+Plur: ceþir
    ces-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [ceþin, ceþinye]
    ces-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: céþa
    ces-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: céþar
    ces-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [céþan, céþanye]
    ces-+V+Fut+Sing: ceþuva
    ces-+V+Fut+Plur: ceþuvar
    ces-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [ceþuvan, ceþuvanye]
  
  Primary Verbs with past tense metathesis and assimilation:
    # TODO: lav-
    lav-+V+Past+Sing: lambe
    lav-+V+Past+Plur: lamber
    lav-+V+Past+Sing+1: [lamben, lambenye]
    lav-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [alávie, lávie]
    lav-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: lávie
    lav-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [alávier, lávier]
    lav-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: lávier
    lav-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [alávien, alávienye, lávien, lávienye]
    lav-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [lávien, lávienye]
    lav-+V+Pres+Sing: lave
    lav-+V+Pres+Plur: lavir
    lav-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [lavin, lavinye]
    lav-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: láva
    lav-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: lávar
    lav-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [lávan, lávanye]
    lav-+V+Fut+Sing: lavuva
    lav-+V+Fut+Plur: lavuvar
    lav-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [lavuvan, lavuvanye]


  # Derived verbs (end in -a)

  Derived Verbs without stem lengthening:
    # TODO: calpa-
    calpa-+V+Past+Sing: calpane
    calpa-+V+Past+Plur: calpaner
    calpa-+V+Past+Sing+1: [calpanen, calpanenye]
    calpa-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [acalpie, calpie]
    calpa-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: calpie
    calpa-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [acalpier, calpier]
    calpa-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: calpier
    calpa-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [acalpien, acalpienye, calpien, calpienye]
    calpa-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [calpien, calpienye]
    calpa-+V+Pres+Sing: calpa
    calpa-+V+Pres+Plur: calpar
    calpa-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [calpan, calpanye]
    calpa-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: calpea
    calpa-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: calpear
    calpa-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [calpean, calpeanye]
    calpa-+V+Fut+Sing: calpuva
    calpa-+V+Fut+Plur: calpuvar
    calpa-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [calpuvan, calpuvanye]

  Derived Verbs with stem lengthening:
    # TODO: tana-
    tana-+V+Past+Sing: tanane
    tana-+V+Past+Plur: tananer
    tana-+V+Past+Sing+1: [tananen, tananenye]
    tana-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [atánie, tánie]
    tana-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: tánie
    tana-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [atánier, tánier]
    tana-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: tánier
    tana-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [atánien, atánienye, tánien, tánienye]
    tana-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [tánien, tánienye]
    tana-+V+Pres+Sing: tana
    tana-+V+Pres+Plur: tanar
    tana-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [tanan, tananye]
    tana-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: tánea
    tana-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: tánear
    tana-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [tánean, táneanye]
    tana-+V+Fut+Sing: tanuva
    tana-+V+Fut+Plur: tanuvar
    tana-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [tanuvan, tanuvanye]
  

  # Verbs that start with vowels

  # Primary Verbs that start with a vowel:
    # TODO
    # long vowel: ???
    # short vowel: see 'us-' above

  Derived Verbs that start with a vowel:
    # TODO
    # long vowel: órava-
    órava-+V+Past+Sing: óravane
    órava-+V+Past+Plur: óravaner
    órava-+V+Past+Sing+1: [óravanen, óravanenye]
    órava-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [oróravie, óravie]
    órava-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: óravie
    órava-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [oróravier, óravier]
    órava-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: óravier
    órava-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [oróravien, oróravienye, óravien, óravienye]
    órava-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [óravien, óravienye]
    órava-+V+Pres+Sing: órava
    órava-+V+Pres+Plur: óravar
    órava-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [óravan, óravanye]
    órava-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: óravea
    órava-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: óravear
    órava-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [óravean, óraveanye]
    órava-+V+Fut+Sing: óravuva
    órava-+V+Fut+Plur: óravuvar
    órava-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [óravuvan, óravuvanye]
    # short vowel: anta-
    anta-+V+Past+Sing: antane
    anta-+V+Past+Plur: antaner
    anta-+V+Past+Sing+1: [antanen, antanenye]
    anta-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [anantie, antie]
    anta-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: antie
    anta-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [anantier, antier]
    anta-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: antier
    anta-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [anantien, anantienye, antien, antienye]
    anta-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [antien, antienye]
    anta-+V+Pres+Sing: anta
    anta-+V+Pres+Plur: antar
    anta-+V+Pres+Sing+1: [antan, antanye]
    anta-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing: antea
    anta-+V+Pres+Prog+Plur: antear
    anta-+V+Pres+Prog+Sing+1: [antean, anteanye]
    anta-+V+Fut+Sing: antuva
    anta-+V+Fut+Plur: antuvar
    anta-+V+Fut+Sing+1: [antuvan, antuvanye]
